Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 2 Foreign Personal Representatives

53-5-42.
Powers.

When an individual dies domiciled outside of this state possessed of a claim to or against real or personal property or a cause of action within this state, if ancillary probate or administration has not been granted and is not pending in this state and there is a personal representative duly qualified and serving under the laws of the domiciliary jurisdiction, ancillary probate or administration shall not be required and the duly qualified personal representative may:

Take possession of personal property of the decedent located within this state and collect accounts or other sums due and payable to the decedent;

Sell and convey any property of the decedent located within this state;

Transfer the decedent’s stock in any bank or other corporation in this state and withdraw deposits made by the decedent and receive dividends declared on the decedent’s stock;

Sue in any court in this state to enforce any cause of action or recover any property of the decedent or the foreign personal representative;

Settle or compromise debts, claims, actions, causes of action, or controversies and give receipts, releases, or acquittances;

Exercise and enforce anywhere in this state any and all rights, powers, or privileges possessed by the decedent or the personal representative pursuant to deeds or bills of sale to secure debts, mortgages, financing statements, or other instruments given as security for debt or as liens of any kind, including foreclosing, taking possession of property to which either is entitled as security, and protecting any and all interests or rights of either as a creditor in bankruptcy, receivership, or other proceedings as fully as could any other person entitled to do so; and

Give deeds of assent and otherwise transfer or execute evidence of ownership of real and personal property located within this state pursuant to the decedent’s will or under the laws of intestacy.

Any of the foregoing powers of the personal representative shall be exercised in the same manner and in conformity with all requirements applicable to a personal representative of a decedent who dies domiciled in this state. If the personal representative of a decedent who dies domiciled outside this state is acting pursuant to the decedent’s will, the personal representative may exercise such powers to the extent and in the manner contemplated by the will as if the will had been admitted to probate within this state. The filing of a petition for ancillary probate or administration in this state shall suspend all authority of the personal representative to perform any act within this state as such personal representative, but such authority shall be reinstated if the petition is dismissed or if the proceedings are otherwise finally terminated without a grant of probate or administration in this state. Any suspension of authority shall not serve to abate any action pending in any court in this state to which the personal representative is a party; when appropriate, the court may substitute a personal representative who becomes qualified in this state in place of the personal representative. The provisions of this Code section shall apply only if the personal representative is a citizen of the United States.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-43.
Evidence of authority.

A copy of letters, or like documentation authenticated in accordance with Code Section 24-9-922, evidencing the qualification of the personal representative of the decedent who died domiciled outside this state, shall constitute prima-facie evidence of the authority of the personal representative to act in this state. Whenever a personal representative shall execute and deliver any deed of assent or conveyance with respect to real property located within this state, the personal representative shall attach to such deed as an exhibit the authenticated copy of the letters, and a certified copy of the will in the case of a testate decedent. The clerks of the superior courts of this state shall not be authorized to accept for filing and recording any deed given by such personal representative that does not conform to the foregoing requirements. Unless a third party has actual knowledge of the existence or pendency of ancillary probate or administration with respect to the decedent within this state, the third party who is dealing with the personal representative in reliance on the personal representative’s letters and, in the case of a testate decedent, the out-of-state or foreign will, shall be fully protected.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 99/HB 24.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

53-5-44.
Application to protect interest in property.

Any person having an interest or claim as heir, beneficiary, or creditor with respect to any real or personal property located within this state of an individual who dies domiciled outside of this state may petition a probate court having jurisdiction for ancillary probate or administration and may apply to a court of equity to compel the personal representative to protect that person’s interest. The court of equity may require ancillary probate or administration, transfer the matter to a probate court in this state having jurisdiction, and order the preservation of the existing status of the property pending the granting of ancillary probate or administration.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-45.
Jurisdiction.

A personal representative of a decedent who died domiciled outside this state submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in any proceeding relating to the estate by:

Receiving payment of money or taking delivery of personal property belonging to the estate of the decedent; or

Doing any act as a personal representative in this state that would have given the state jurisdiction over the actor as an individual.

Jurisdiction under paragraph (1) of this subsection is limited to the money or value of personal property collected.

In addition to the jurisdiction conferred under subsection (a) of this Code section, a personal representative of a decedent who died domiciled outside this state is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to the same extent that the decedent was subject to jurisdiction immediately prior to death.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-46.
Service of process.

Service of process may be made upon the personal representative of a decedent who dies domiciled outside this state by registered or certified mail, addressed to the personal representative’s last reasonably ascertainable address, requesting a return receipt signed by the addressee only. Service of process upon such a personal representative may also be perfected by statutory overnight delivery as provided in Code Section 9-10-12 if the receipt provided by the commercial delivery company is signed by the addressee. Notice by first-class mail is sufficient if certified or registered mail service to the addressee is unavailable. Service may be made upon the personal representative in the manner in which service could have been made under other laws of this state on either the personal representative or the decedent immediately prior to death.

If service is made on the personal representative as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the personal representative shall be allowed at least 30 days within which to appear and respond.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 15.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

53-5-47.
Effect of adjudication.

An adjudication with respect to personal property rendered in any jurisdiction in favor of or against any personal representative of the estate of a decedent who died outside this state is as binding upon the personal representative as if that person were a party to the adjudication.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.